Maryland, session 2026, HB0354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
6–309.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, this section controls as to
Anne Arundel County.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0354*

HOUSE BILL 354
(b) (1) (I) The Administration may not acquire any interest in land or
improvements on land in Anne Arundel County without the prior approval of the county,
given after a public hearing.
(II) AT LEAST 2 WEEKS BEFORE THE ANNOUNCEMENT OF A
PUBLIC HEARING REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE HEARING TO THE ANNE
ARUNDEL COUNTY DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(2) This subsection does not affect the right of the Administration to
acquire an option for later acquisition of the property or improvements once the approval
required by this subsection is obtained.
(3) If the Administration makes a written request for approval of the
county, the approval required by this subsection is deemed to be given unless the
Administration is notified in writing to the contrary within 90 days after it makes the
request.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.